Missouri, session 2026, SB1727.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 139.100, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 139.100,
to read as follows:
139.100. 1. (1) If any taxpayer shall fail or
neglect to pay to the collector his taxes at the time
required by law, then it shall be the duty of the collector,
after the first day of January then next ensuing and in the
absence of an agreement entered into pursuant to subdivision
(2) of this subsection, to collect and account for, as other
taxes, an additional tax, as penalty, the amount provided
for in section 140.100.
(2) For property tax liabilities incurred on or after
January 1, 2020, and on or before December 31, 2020, the
collector of any county with a charter form of government
and with more than nine hundred fifty thousand inhabitants
may enter into an agreement with any taxpayer for the
payment of any amount of tax not paid at the time required
by law, including a waiver or reduction of penalties and
interest on such taxes, provided that any such agreement
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1727 2
shall require such taxes to be paid to the collector or
postmarked by no later than January 8, 2021.
(3) For any taxpayer that has paid penalties and
interest on property tax liabilities not paid at the time
required by law, and such penalties and interest are
subsequently reduced or waived through an agreement entered
into pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection, that
portion of penalties and interest paid and subsequently
reduced or waived may be credited to the taxpayer on such
taxpayer's tax liability for the subsequent year. The
county may reduce on a pro rata basis any distributions to
taxing jurisdictions by the amount of any penalties and
interest from late payments from the 2020 tax year that were
collected and distributed, but were then subsequently
reduced or waived pursuant to subdivision (2) of this
subsection.
2. Collectors shall, on the day of their annual
settlement with the county governing body, file with
governing body a statement, under oath, of the amount so
received, and from whom received, and settle with the
governing body therefor; but, interest shall not be
chargeable against persons who are absent from their homes,
and engaged in the military service of this state or of the
United States. The provisions of this section shall apply
to the City of St. Louis, so far as the same relates to the
addition of such interest, which, in such city, shall be
collected and accounted for by the collector as other taxes,
for which he shall receive no compensation.
3. Whenever any collector of the revenue in the state
fails or refuses to collect the penalty provided for in this
section on state and county taxes, it shall be the duty of
the director of revenue and county clerk to charge such

SB 1727 3
collectors with the amount of interest due thereon, as shown
by the returns of the county clerk, and such collector shall
be liable to the penalties as provided for in section
139.270.
4. [For purposes of this section and other provisions
of law relating to the timely payment of taxes due on any
real or personal property, payments for taxes due on any
real or personal property which are delivered by United
States mail to the collector, the collector's office, or
other officer or office designated by the county or city to
receive such payments, of the appropriate county or city,
shall be deemed paid as of the postmark date stamped on the
envelope or other cover in which such payment is mailed. In
the event any payment of taxes due is sent by registered or
certified mail, the date of registration or certification
shall be deemed the postmark date. No additional tax or
penalty shall be imposed under this section on any taxpayer
whose payment is delivered by United States mail, if the
postmark date stamped on the envelope or other cover
containing such payment falls within the prescribed period
or on or before the prescribed date, including any extension
granted, for making the payment or if the postmaster for the
jurisdiction where the payment was mailed verifies in
writing that the payment was deposited in the United States
mail within the prescribed period or on or before the
prescribed date, including any extension granted, for making
the payment, and was delayed in delivery because of an error
by the United States postal service and not because of an
error by the taxpayer. In the absence of a postmark, or if
the postmark is illegible or otherwise inconclusive, the
collector may use the collector's judgment regarding the
timeliness of the payment contained therein and shall

SB 1727 4
document such decision] Any payment of real or personal
property taxes transmitted through the United States Postal
Service and postmarked no later than January fifth of the
year immediately following the applicable tax year shall be
deemed timely paid and shall not be subject to penalty or
interest; provided, however, that regardless of postmark
date, any check, cashier's check, or money order dated later
than December thirty-first of the applicable tax year shall
be considered delinquent, and further provided that any
payment made by means other than United States Postal
Service mail, including, but not limited to, in-person,
electronic, internet, interactive voice response, or
electronic check payments, shall be considered delinquent if
received after December thirty-first of the applicable tax
year.
✓